Washington statutes.
RCW 36.73.010

Intent.

The legislature finds that the citizens of the state can benefit by cooperation of the public and private sectors in addressing transportation needs. This cooperation can be fostered through enhanced capability for cities, towns, and counties to make and fund transportation improvements necessitated by economic development and to improve the performance of the transportation system.

It is the intent of the legislature to encourage joint efforts by the state, local governments, and the private sector to respond to the need for those transportation improvements on state highways, county roads, and city streets. This goal can be better achieved by allowing cities, towns, and counties to establish transportation benefit districts in order to respond to the special transportation needs and economic opportunities resulting from private sector development for the public good. The legislature also seeks to facilitate the equitable participation of private developers whose developments may generate the need for those improvements in the improvement costs.

[ 2005 c 336 s 2; 1987 c 327 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 336: See note following RCW 36.73.015.